Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6565XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2170 Section 1. Section 261E.8, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. A student may make application to a community 3 college and the school district to allow the student to enroll 4 for college credit in a nonsectarian course offered by the 5 community college. A comparable course, as defined in rules 6 adopted by the board of directors of the school district, must 7 not be offered by the school district or accredited nonpublic 8 school which the student attends. 9 b. If the community college offers the course using both 10 instruction that is delivered in person and using instruction 11 that is delivered primarily over the internet, then the student 12 must enroll in the version of the course that uses instruction 13 that is delivered in person unless the superintendent of the 14 school district authorizes the student to enroll in the version 15 of the course that uses instruction that is delivered primarily 16 over the internet. 17 c. The school board shall annually approve courses to be 18 made available for high school credit using locally developed 19 criteria that establishes which courses will provide the 20 student with academic rigor and will prepare the student 21 adequately for transition to a postsecondary institution. 22 d. If a community college accepts a student for enrollment 23 under this section , the school district, in collaboration 24 with the community college, shall send written notice to the 25 student, the studentâs parent or legal guardian in the case of 26 a minor child, and the studentâs school district. The notice 27 shall list the course, the clock hours the student will be 28 attending the course, and the number of hours of college credit 29 that the student will receive from the community college upon 30 successful completion of the course. 31